test/src/morphology/V-karkytusa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - каркытуса: # Verb I. '/(eng) to twitch/(rus) дёргаться' - 
# Nganasan verbs (imperfective, present tense)
# NgDic 2001; typed up FS
# Verb stems ending in -у/-ү
# (2001: 380)
     каркытуса+V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg1: каркытундум
     каркытуса+V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg2: каркытундуӊ
     каркытуса+V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg3: каркытуту
     каркытуса+V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu1: каркытутуми
     каркытуса+V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu2: каркытутури
     каркытуса+V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu3: каркытутугәй
     каркытуса+V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl1: каркытутумуˮ
     каркытуса+V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl2: каркытутуруˮ
     каркытуса+V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl3: каркытундуˮ
